Massachusetts, session 194th, H2351.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary and pursuant
to the provisions of article 97 of the amendments to the Massachusetts Constitution, Barnstable
county may convey to the town of Bourne property located at 0 County road and 100 Dr. Julius
Kelley lane in Bourne and shown as lot 7 on land court plan no. 24204C, including the parcel of
land shown as lot 8 on land court plan no. 24204D, subject to the conservation restriction
encumbering a portion of said property, which restriction is registered with the Barnstable land
court registry district as document #978,790, as amended.
(b) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary and pursuant to the
provisions of article 97 of the amendments to the Massachusetts Constitution, the town of
Bourne, being the holder of the foregoing conservation restriction, may assign or transfer said
of 2

restriction to a qualified entity for the purpose of acquiring from Barnstable county ownership of
the property described in subsection (a) above.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2